Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 5 Child Care Agencies
Acts 2004, ch. 713, § 1 purported to amend this section; however, the clerk of the house of representatives found that the act did not pass the house and the senate in the same form and was not given effect. Acts 2005, ch. 453, § 2 repealed Acts 2004, ch. 713, effective July 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.